src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: garður
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: garð
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: garði
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: garðs
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: garðar
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: garðar
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: gørðum
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: garða
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: garðurin
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: garðin
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: garðinum
    garður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: garðsins
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: garðarnir
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: garðarnar
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: gørðunum
    garður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: garðanna
